Utah statutes.
58-77-102.   Definitions.

In addition to the definitions in Section 58-1-102, as used in this chapter:

(1)  "Board" means the Licensed Direct-entry Midwife Board created in Section 58-77-201.

(2)  "Certified nurse-midwife" means a person licensed under Title 58, Chapter 44a, Nurse Midwife Practice Act.

(3)  "Client" means a woman under the care of a Direct-entry midwife and her fetus or newborn.

(4) "Direct-entry midwife" means an individual who is engaging in the practice of Direct-entry midwifery.

(5)  "Licensed Direct-entry midwife" means a person licensed under this chapter.

(6)  "Low risk" means a labor and delivery and postpartum, newborn and interconceptual care that does not include a condition that requires a mandatory transfer under administrative rules adopted by the division.

(7)  "Physician" means an individual licensed as a physician and surgeon, osteopathic physician, or naturopathic physician.

(8)  "Practice of Direct-entry midwifery" means practice of providing the necessary supervision, care, and advice to a client during essentially normal pregnancy, labor, delivery, postpartum, and newborn periods that is consistent with national professional midwifery standards and that is based upon the acquisition of clinical skills necessary for the care of pregnant women and newborns, including antepartum, intrapartum, postpartum, newborn, and limited interconceptual care and includes:

(a)  obtaining an informed consent to provide services;

(b)  obtaining a health history, including a physical examination;

(c)  developing a plan of care for a client;

(d)  evaluating the results of client care;

(e)  consulting and collaborating with and referring and transferring care to licensed health care professionals, as is appropriate, regarding the care of a client;

(f)  obtaining medications, as specified in this Subsection (8)(f) , to administer to clients, including:

(i)  prescription vitamins;

(ii)  Rho D immunoglobulin;

(iii)  sterile water;

(iv)  one dose of intramuscular oxytocin after the delivery of the placenta to minimize blood loss;

(v)  an additional single dose of oxytocin if a hemorrhage occurs, in which case the licensed Direct-entry midwife must initiate transfer if the client's condition does not immediately improve;

(vi)  oxygen;

(vii)  local anesthetics without epinephrine used in accordance with Subsection (8)(l);

(viii)  vitamin K to prevent hemorrhagic disease of the newborn;

(ix)  eye prophylaxis to prevent opthalmia neonatorum as required by law; and

(x)  any other medication approved by a licensed health care provider with authority to prescribe that medication;

(g)  obtaining food, food extracts, dietary supplements, as defined by the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, homeopathic remedies, plant substances that are not designated as prescription drugs or controlled substances, and over-the-counter medications to administer to clients;

(h)  obtaining and using appropriate equipment and devices such as Doppler, blood pressure cuff, phlebotomy supplies, instruments, and sutures;

(i)  obtaining appropriate screening and testing, including laboratory tests, urinalysis, and ultrasound;

(j)  managing the antepartum period;

(k)  managing the intrapartum period including:

(i)  monitoring and evaluating the condition of mother and fetus;

(ii)  performing emergency episiotomy; and

(iii)  delivering in any out-of-hospital setting;

(l)  managing the postpartum period including suturing of episiotomy or first and second degree natural perineal and labial lacerations, including the administration of a local anesthetic;

(m)  managing the newborn period including:

(i)  providing care for the newborn, including performing a normal newborn examination; and

(ii)  resuscitating a newborn;

(n)  providing limited interconceptual services in order to provide continuity of care including:

(i)  breastfeeding support and counseling;

(ii)  family planning, limited to natural family planning, cervical caps, and diaphragms; and

(iii)  pap smears, where all clients with abnormal results are to be referred to an appropriate licensed health care provider; and

(o)  executing the orders of a licensed health care professional, only within the education, knowledge, and skill of the Direct-entry midwife.

(9)  "Unlawful conduct" is as defined in Sections 58-1-501 and 58-77-501.

(10)  "Unprofessional conduct" is as defined in Sections 58-1-501 and 58-77-502 and as may be further defined by rule.

